Arkansas, session 2025, HB1119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-10-410 is amended to read as follows:
24-10-410. Delinquent payments Delinquency.
(a) If any a political subdivision fails to make any a payment or
reporting due the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System for a
period of ten (10) days after the payment is within five (5) calendar days of
the date the payment or reporting is due, the political subdivision shall
become delinquent, and the delinquency shall be certified according to the
rules established by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and
Fire Retirement System to the Treasurer of State.
(b) Until the delinquency, together with regular interest, is
satisfied, the Treasurer of State is authorized and directed to withhold all
moneys due the political subdivision by the state.

*LJH030*
01/14/2025 8:52:08 AM LJH030

HB1119
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the management of delinquent
payments collected for the benefit of municipal firemen's relief and pension
funds and policemen's pension and relief funds is in need of a change in
administration from the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System to
the Department of Finance and Administration for purposes of financial
security and efficiency; and that an effective date of July 1, 2025, is
necessary in order to allow time to complete programming and send educational
notices to covered employers of the procedures referenced in this act.
Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary
for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become
effective on July 1, 2025.
























01/14/2025 8:52:08 AM LJH030